Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.090

Elections—Conduct—Voters' qualifications.

The elections on the proposed incorporation and for the nomination and election of the initial elected officials shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of the state, except as provided in this chapter. No person is entitled to vote thereat unless he or she is a qualified elector of the county, or any of the counties in which the proposed city or town is located, and has resided within the limits of the proposed city or town for at least thirty days next preceding the date of election.

[ 1986 c 234 s 12; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.090. Prior: 1890 p 133 s 3, part; RRS s 8885, part.]